en: French-style pale ale, French pale ale
fr: Bières de garde

en: Trappist beers, Trappist
xx: Trappist beers, Trappist
fr: Bières trappistes
it: Birre trappiste

en: Abbey ales, Abbey beer, Abbey ale, Abbey beers
de: Abteibier
fi: luostariolut
fr: Bières d'abbayes, Bières d'abbaye, Bières d'abbayes régionales
hr: Opatsko pivo
hu: Apátsági sörök
it: Birre d'abbazia
nl: Abdijbieren
zh: 修道院艾尔啤酒

en: Single ales
nl: Enkel

en: Belgian-style Dubbel ales, Double ales, Double beer
xx: Dubbel
de: Doppelte Biere
fr: Bière double
hu: Dubbel sörök
it: Birra doppia, doppia birra
nl: Dubbelgegist bier

en: Triple ales, Triple beer
xx: Tripel
de: Dreifache Biere
fi: Tripel-olut
fr: Bière triple
hu: Tripel sörök
it: Birra tripla, tripla birra
nl: Tripel bieren

en: Quadruple ales, Quadruple beer
de: Vierfache Biere
fr: Bière quadruple
hr: Četverostruki ales, Četverostruki pivo
hu: Quadrupel sör
it: Birre quadruple
nl: Quadrupel bieren

en: Blonde ales, Blonde ale, Blond ale
es: Cerveza rubia
fr: Bières blondes, bière blonde
hr: Plavokosi ales
nl: Blonde bieren
ro: Beri blonde, Bere blondă, Bere blonda

en: Belgian-style blonde ales, Belgian blonde, Belgian blonde ales
xx: Belgian-style blonde ales, Belgian blonde, Belgian blonde ales

en: American-style blonde ales, American blonde, American blonde ales
xx: American-style blonde ales, American blonde, American blonde ales
zh: 美式金色艾尔啤酒

en: Dark ales, Dark ale
lt: Tamsusis elis

en: Stouts, stout
de: Stouts
fi: Stout
fr: Bières brunes, bière brune
hr: Punašnice
it: Birre scure, Birra scura
ja: スタウト
nl: Stout
pl: Stouty, Piwa ciemne
zh: 烈性黑啤酒

en: Irish-style stouts, Irish stouts, Irish stout
xx: Irish-style stouts, Irish stouts, Irish stout

en: Porters, Porter, porter beers
xx: Porters, porter
lt: Porteris

en: Baltic porter, Baltic porter beers
lt: Baltijos porteris

en: Brown ales, brown ale
lt: Rudasis elis

en: Altbier beers, Altbier
xx: Altbier beers, Altbier
zh: 阿尔特啤酒

en: Red Ales, Red Ale, Red beers
de: Rotbier
fr: Bières rousses, bière rousse
hr: Crvena piva
hu: Vörös sörök
it: Birre rosse
zh: 红啤酒, 红啤

en: Irish red ales, Irish red ale
xx: Irish red ales, Irish red ale
lt: Iriškas raudonas elis

en: Catharina Sour beers, Catharina Sour
xx: Catharina Sour beers, Catharina Sour